Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 22 Private Correctional Facilities

Editor's notes. —

There is no article 2 in this chapter as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability of act. —

Laws 1991, ch. 252, § 3, provides: “The powers and authority set forth in this act shall be in addition to such other powers and authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming relating to correctional facilities or jails, and the requirements set forth in this act (including in particular, requirements relating to the obtaining of necessary consents and approvals) shall be deemed to apply only to actions taken or to be taken under authority of this act and shall not apply to any such other powers or authority as may presently exist under the laws of the state of Wyoming.”